Texas statutes.
OCCUPATIONS CODE

TITLE 13. SPORTS, AMUSEMENTS, AND ENTERTAINMENT

SUBTITLE D. OTHER AMUSEMENTS AND ENTERTAINMENT

CHAPTER 2158. SPECIAL EVENT PARKING CHARGE LIMITATION

Sec. 2158.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Institution of higher education" and "private or independent institution of higher education" have the meanings assigned by Section 61.003, Education Code.

(2) "Parking facility," "parking facility owner," and "vehicle" have the meanings assigned by Section 2308.002, Occupations Code.

(3) "Special event" includes a sporting event, convention, concert, exhibit, parade, or political rally.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1236 (S.B. 1296), Sec. 19.001(a), eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 2158.002. LIMITATION OF PARKING CHARGE IN CONNECTION WITH SPECIAL EVENT. (a) A parking facility owner may not charge for parking a vehicle in the parking facility in connection with a special event an amount that is more than two times the amount computed using the rate that is normally charged for parking a vehicle in the facility on that day of the week and at that time.

(b) This section does not apply to an institution of higher education or a private or independent institution of higher education.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1236 (S.B. 1296), Sec. 19.001(a), eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 2158.003. CRIMINAL OFFENSE. (a) A person commits an offense if the person violates Section 2158.002(a).

(b) An offense under this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

(c) It is a defense to prosecution under this section that the parking facility owner posted a conspicuous sign at least two feet wide and two feet high at the entrance to the parking facility stating:

(1) in print at least six inches in height, the rate that is normally charged for parking a vehicle in the facility; and

(2) in print at least six inches in height, the rate that is charged for parking a vehicle in the facility in connection with a special event.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1236 (S.B. 1296), Sec. 19.001(a), eff. September 1, 2015.